Hawaii statutes.
[§6E-17] Archaeological data survey
database. (a) There is established a Hawaii archaeological data survey
database designated as a program of the State of Hawaii Museum of Natural and
Cultural History. The database shall be online and accessible to the public through the Internet. The information within
the database may include information relating to the collections of the Bernice
Pauahi Bishop Museum, publicly available materials, and materials from private
entities or organizations. The database may include archaeological information
such as reports, photographs, drawings, maps, and archived documents. The database may also include compilations of
collections information from public and private repositories including:

(1) A description of the types and amounts of
materials and associated documentation in each collection;

(2) A listing of the owner or owners of all materials
and associated documentation in each collection;

(3) A general assessment of the condition of the
components of each collection; and

(4) Other relevant information pertaining to each
collection.

The data survey database shall be developed and
maintained by the State of Hawaii Museum of Natural and Cultural History, in
consultation with the state historic preservation division and other
appropriate state and federal agencies and private organizations.

(b) The archaeological data survey shall not
include any information required to remain confidential under federal, state,
or county laws, rules, or regulations.

(c) The State of Hawaii Museum of Natural and
Cultural History, in consultation with the office of Hawaiian affairs and the
state historic preservation division, may temporarily or permanently withhold
from the database any information due to a valid threat of destruction or loss
of the information, or if disclosure may frustrate the legitimate and necessary
function of protecting a valuable archaeological site or artifact. The
entities shall determine what information shall be withheld from the data
survey; provided that prior consultation is sought with any affected state or
federal governmental agencies, or private individuals or organizations. [L
2008, c 161, §1]

Cross References

Bernice Pauahi Bishop Museum, see §6E-40.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next